Utah statutes.
54-1-1.6.   Pro tempore commissioner -- Appointment -- Qualifications.

(1)  If a commissioner has a temporary disability or is disqualified from sitting as a commissioner, the governor may appoint a commissioner pro tempore according to the procedures and requirements of Section 67-1-1.5.

(2)  Any person appointed as a commissioner pro tempore shall possess the qualifications required for public service commissioners in Section 54-1-1.5 and have previous utility regulatory experience or other comparable professional experience.

(3)  The governor may appoint a retired or resigned public service commissioner as a commissioner pro tempore in order to render findings, orders, or decisions on matters which the retired or resigned commissioner had fully heard before the commissioner's retirement or resignation.

